Hawaii statutes.
[§323G-5]
Preservation of coverage. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
remove the obligation of a third-party payer to cover a health care item or
service that the third-party payer is obligated to provide to a patient under
the terms of a valid agreement, insurance policy, plan, or certification of
coverage or health maintenance organization contract. [L 2016, c 69, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next